New York, session 2025-2026, A5010.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. The general business law is amended by adding a new section 2 399-jj to read as follows: 3 § 399-jj. Prohibits the sale of dry ice to individuals under eighteen 4 years of age. 1. No person, corporation, partnership or limited liabil- 5 ity company shall knowingly sell or offer for sale dry ice to an indi- 6 vidual under eighteen years of age. 7 2. Any person, corporation, partnership or limited liability company 8 selling or offering for sale dry ice shall require proof of legal age 9 prior to allowing an individual to purchase dry ice. Such identification 10 need not be required of any individual who reasonably appears to be at 11 least twenty-five years of age, provided, however, that such appearance 12 shall not constitute a defense in any proceeding alleging the sale of 13 dry ice to an individual under eighteen years of age. 14 3. Any person, corporation, partnership or limited liability company 15 which violates the provisions of this section shall be subject to a 16 civil penalty of not more than five hundred dollars per violation. 17 § 2. This act shall take effect on the sixtieth day after it shall 18 have become a law. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD07800-01-5